NHyphenator-Mono/Resources/hyph-de-ch.pat.txt
.aa6l
.6a1ba
.ab3a4s
.a1be
.ab3ei
.a1bi2
.ab3it
.a1b1l8
.a1b1r
.a1b3u
.a1d
.a1do
.ad3o4r
.a2l1t
.alti6
.a3na3c
.an5a2l1g
.a1n1e
.an2gs
.ang8s2t1
.a6n1s
.ap1p
.a2r1s
.ar6sc
.a2r1t
.ar6ta
.8ar6tei
.as2z
.au2f1
.au2s3
.1be
.be5er1b
.be3na
.be2r1t
.ber6t5r6
.1bi
.b6ie
.bie6r5
.bi2ms
.bim6s5t
.1br
.brot3
.br6u6s
.c8h6
.1che6f5
.1da8c
.da2r
.d2a1ri
.dar5in
.da1r5u
.1de
.den6ka
.de1re
.de5r6en
.de1sp2
.des6pe
.de8s2p2o
.de3s1z
.1di
.dia3s4
.dien4
.dy2s1
.e6hr
.eh1re
.ehre6n5
.ei1ne6
.ei6n5eh
.ei8nen
.ei6ns
.ein5sa
.e2n1d
.en1de
.en6der
.en6d5r4
.en3k4
.en8ta8
.en1te
.en8tei
.en4t3r6
.e1p2o1
.er1b
.er1ba
.er6ban
.er1be
.er6b5ei
.erbl8
.er6bla
.e8rd
.er1du
.er6d5um
.e1re
.2er3ei
.e1r5er
.2e1ri
.er3in
.er3o4b
.er1w
.erwi5s
.e1s1p2
.e2s8t1l
.es8t1n
.ex1a2
.ex3em
.fa2ls
.fal6sc
.1fe
.fe6s1t5a
.flu4g3
.1fu
.furc8h8
.1ga
.ga1ne
.ga6ner
.1ge
.ge3n4a
.ge5rö8
.ge1s6
.ha2lb5
.hal1be6
.hal6br
.haup4
.hau4t
.hei1ma6
.he4r3e
.her6za
.he5x
.hin3
.hi2r1s
.hir8sc
.ho4c
.hu3sa
.hy5o
.i1be5
.i1ma
.ima6ge
.in1
.i1ni6
.isc8h
.i1s5chi
.ja6gd5
.1ka
.ka6l1k
.kal6k5o
.ka6ph
.ki4e
.1k2o
.kop6f3
.1kr8
.kraf6
.1kü
.kü5ra
.la2b1b
.lab6br
.1li
.l8i1i
.liie6
.lo6s5k2
.1lös
.lö4s3t
.1ma
.ma5d2
.1mi
.mi2t1
.no6th
.no1to
.no6top
.o1be
.ob2e8ri
.o1b1l8
.o8bs2
.ob6s1t5e
.or3c
.o2r1t
.or2ts
.ort6s5e
.o1st3a
.os1te
.oste8r
.1pe
.p8er
.pe4re6
.pe3t2s
.1ph6
.1p2o
.po8str6
.r6au4m3
.re5an
.ro8q
.ru5the
.rü5b6e2
.sc8h8
.1se
.se6e
.se5n6h
.se5ra
.1si
.si2e
.sp2
.1spi
.spi1k
.spi6ke
.st4
.1sy
.sy2n1
.1tag
.ta1ge
.tage4s5
.tan6kl8
.ta8th
.te6e
.te8str6
.to1d
.to1de4
.to6der
.t8o1ni
.to8nin
.to6we
.um1
.u2mp
.umpf4
.un1
.u1ne6
.un1ge
.ung8e5n
.ur1c
.u1re
.ur5en
.1ve
.ver1
.v2e1ri
.ve6rin
.v2or1
.vora8
.1wah
.wah6l5
.1weg
.we1ge
.we8ge1s
.we8s2t
.wes3te
.wo6r
.wor3a
.wu6n4s
.1zi
.zi4e
.1zu
.z2uc
.zuc8h8
.ä2n1d
.än1de
.ände8re
.öc8h8
aa1c
aa2gr4
aa1l5e
aa6r5a
aa2r1t
a5arti
aa2s1t
aa2t2s
6a1ba
ab3a2r1t
a2b1d
1abdr4
a1be
6ab8el
abe2n1d
aben6dr4
ab5e6rk
ab5e2r1r
ab5e2s1se
1a2b1f8
1a2b1g2
a2b1h
1abhä
a1bi
ab1ir
a2b1k2
1ab1k2o
a1bl8
ab1la
5a6blag
a6bl8aß
ab4ler
a1b1lu
a8blä
5a6blö
a2b1m
ab1ma
abma5c
1a2b1n
a1br
ab1ra
ab1re
5a6brec
ab1ro
a8b1s
ab8s1k2
abs2z
a2b1t
3abtei
a1bu
ab1ur
1a2b1w
a8b1z
5ab1ze
5ab1zu
a1bä
ab1än
abäu8
a1ce
a4ce.
ac8h
a5chal
ach5a2r1t
ach5au
a1che
a8chent
ach6er.
a6ch5er1f
a1chi
ach1l6
a6ch3m
a2ch5n6
a1cho
ac6hr
ach3re
a1chu
a8ch1w
a1chy
ach5äf
ac2k
ac1k2o
a2c2ks
acks6t8
ack5sta
a1d
8ad.
a6d5ac
ad3ant
ad8ar
a2d1d
5ad1di
a1de
a8dein
ade5o8
a1di
adi5en
1ad1j
a2d1l
1adle
a1do
ad1op
adr4
a2dre
3adres
a2dt1
1a2d1v
a6dä
a1e2d
ae1r
a1er.
1aero
8afa
a3fal
af1an
a5far
a5fat
af1au
a1fe
a6fen2t1l
a2f1ex1
a2ff
af1fr6
afr6
af5rau
af1re
1afri
a2ft
af1te
af6tent
af1tr6
af6tra
aft5re
a1fu
a6f5um
8a1fä
a1ga
ag5a1be
a1ge
5a4gent
ag8er
age1s
age1s5e
a2g1g
1ag1gr4
a1g5las
ag1lo
a1gn8
ag2ne
a1go
1a2g8o1g
a1gu
a6g5u2n1d
a1ha
a1he
a2h5ein
a4h3er1h8
a1hi
ahl1a
ah1le
ah1ma
ah4m3ar
ahn1a
a5ho
a6hr
ahra6
ahr5ab
ah1re
ah8rei
ahre6n8s
ahre4s3
ah2r1t
ahr8ti
ah1ru
a1hu
ah8ö
ai1d
ai3d2s
ai1e
a2if6
ai6ns
a3in1se
ai1re
ai4re.
aisc8h
a5i8s2ch.
ai1s8e
ai2s1m
a3ismu
ais6n
ai1so6
a1j
a1ka
1aka1d
a4ka1de
a1ke
a1ki
a2k1k2
1ak1k2o
a1kr8
5akro1
a5lal
al5a6ns
3al8a6r1m
a2lb
al1be
al8be1b
al8ber1w
albl8
alb5la
al1bu
3album
a8l1c
a1le
ale1b
a6l5e6be
a4l3ein
a8lel
a1ler
a8ler1b
a8ler1h8
a6le2r1t
5a6l5eth
a2l1g
1al1gi
al4g1li
a1li
a2l3int
a6ll
al1la
al4lab
al8lan
al4l3ar
al1le
alle3g
a1lo
a4l5ob
a2ls
al1sc
alsc8h
al6s6ch2m
a2l1t
al4the
altr6
al4t3re
8a1lu
al6u5i
a6lur
alu3ta
a1lä
a1ma
a6ma1te
a1me
8ame.
5a6mei1se
a2m1m
am1me
am6m5ei
am6mum
am2n8
a2mp
ampf3a6
a2ms
am1sc
amsc8h
am6s8chw
a2m1t
am2ta
a1mu
a1mä
a3na2c
a1na1d
ana1di
anadi5e
an3a1k2o
an3a6l1p
3a8na1ly
an3a1me
an3a2ra
a1nas
an5as1ti
a1nat
ana2t5s
a2n1d
an1de
an8dent
ande4s3
a1ne
a2n1ec
a8n5eis
an1e2k
4aner.
a6n5e8rd
a8ner1f
ane6rk
a6n5er1ke
an1f
1anfa
an1fe
5anfe2r1t
1an1fä
an1ga
3angab
an1ge
ange1b
5ange1bo
an3g1li
ang6lis
an2gn8
an1gr4
3angri
an2g5t6
an1h
5anhä
a1ni
ani5g
an6i1k
ani4ka
an2io
an5i8on
an1kl8
an1k2n8
an6kno
an1kr8
an4kro
1an5l6
an1m
an1ma
anma5c
anmar4
an1na
3an1n2ah
an1ne
anne4s3
a1no
5a6n1o2d
5a6n3o1ma
5a6no8rd
1an1r
a6ns
an1sa
an1sc
ansc8h
5anschl6
an1so
an4so1z
an1st
an1sta
5anstal
an1s2z
an1te
5antenn
an1th
a8n1w
5anwä
a5ny
an1ze
an4z3e1d
5anzeig
an1zi
5anzieh
an1zu
3anzug
an1ä
5anäs
a1nö
anö8d
a1os
a1pa
ap1fe
3apfel
a1ph
a2ph1t2
aph5ä6
a1pi
8apl8
a1p2o
apo1c
apo1s
a6pos2t
a6po1th
1ap1pa
ap1pr6
a1pr6
a5pä
a3pü
a1ra
a4r3af
a2r3a6ll
ar1b
ar1be
3arbei
2ar2b1t
ar1c
2a1re
ar3ein
a8r1g
ar2gl
2a1ri
ar2ie
ari5es
a6rk
ar1ke
ar8ke2r1s
ar1l
ar6les
a2rn
ar1na
ar4nan
ar5o6c8h
ar1o2d
a1rol
ar2on
ar3ony
a8ror
a3ros
ar5ox
a2r1s
arsc8h
ar6schl6
a2r1t
8ar5tei
artr6
ar6t5ri
a1ru
a1ry
1ar2z1t
arz1w8
ar8zä
arä8m
arö6
ar5öm
ar1ü2
a1sa
asc8h
a1sche
a6schec
asch5l6
as6ch3m
a6s2chn6
as1h
a3s4hi
asp2
as1pa
asp5l8
as1te
as5te1v
1a2sth
a1str6
ast3re
8a1ta
ata5c
ata3la
a6tapf
at8a5pl8
a1te
a6te1li
aten5a
ate5ran
6a2t1f2
6a2t1g2
a1th
ath6a
at3hal
1a2th1l
2a1ti
a2t1l
atl8a
5atlant
3atlas
a2t1m8
8atmus
6a2t1n
a1to
a6t5ops
ato6ra
ato2r1t
a6t5ort.
4a1tr6
a6t5ru
a2t1t
at2t1h
at5t6hä
6a1tu
a2tz
atz1w8
a1tä
a1tü
au1a
au1br
au6bre
a2uc
auc8h
auch3a
au1e
aue4l
au1fe
5au4f3ent
au2ff
3auf1fü
au2f1g2
3auf1ga
1au2f1n
au2f1t
3auf1tr6
1au2f1w
au1ge
3auge.
a6uk
au1kl8
au4kle
au1le
aule8s
6aum
au1ma
au8mar
au2m5p
1au2s1b2
3au2s1d
1au2s1f2
1au2s3g2
au1si
au8sin
au4sta
1au2s1w
1aus1z
au1te
aut5eng
au1th
1au1to
au1ße8
a1v
a1ve
aver1
ave5r6a
av2e1r6i
a1w
a6wes
a1x
a1xi
a2xia
a6x2io
a1ya
a1z
a1zi
azi5er.
8aß
1ba
ba1d
ba1de
8ba8del
ba1la
ba1na
ban6k5r8
ba5ot
ba8rd
bar1di
bardi6n
ba1ro
bas1te
basten6
bau3sp2
2b1b
bbl8
bb6le
b2b1li
2b1c
2b1d
1be
be1a
be8at.
be1c8h
8be2cht
bec2k
8be1cke.
be5el
be1en
bee3r4e
be2e8rei
be5e1ta
be1f2
8be2ff
be1g2
be1hö8
bei1s
bei1se
6b5eisen
bei3tr6
b8el
b4e1l8o
be1lu
belu3t2
be3na2c
be2n1d
ben1d6o
be1ne
be6n5e2r1s
be6n5er1w
be1no
be4nor
be6ns
ben4se6
bens5el
be1nä
be1nü
be1o2
b8er.
be1ra
be8rac
be8r1g
ber1ga
ber8gab.
be2r1r
be1rü
be1s8c
be1se
bes5er1h8
be1s2p2
be5th6a
be2ts
bet5sc
be1un
be1ur
8bex
be1z
bezw8
be6zwec
2b1f8
2b1g2
b1ga
bga2s5
b1ge1
2b1h
bho1le6
1bi
bi1bl8
b6ie
bi1el
b2il
bi1la
bi1lä5
bi1na
bi1no
bi4no1k
bi6stu
bi5tr6
bi2t1t
bit4t5r6
b1j
2b1k2
b1kü6
bl8
b6la.
6b1la1d
6blag
8blam
1blat
b8la2t1t
3blau.
b6la1v
3ble.
b1le1b
b1le1d
8b1leg
8b1leh
8blei1d
8bleih
6b3lein
bl4e4m3o2
b1li
4blic8h
b4li2n1d
8bling
b2l2io
5blit
b4li2tz
b1loh
8b1los
1blu
5blum
2b1lun
blut3a
blu2ts
blut5sc
3blä
blä6s5c
5blö
3blü
blü8sc
2b1m
2b1n
1bo
bo1c8h
bo1d
bo5d6s
boe5
8bo2ff
8bon1k
bo1ra
b1o2r1t
2b1p2
b1q
1br
bra2il6
brast8
bre4a
b5re1d
8bre1f
br2ie
8b5riem
b1r2ig
b6ri1ga
bro1s
b1rup
b2ruz
8bröh
brö2s5c
8bs
b1sa
b8sang
b2s1ar
b1sc
b1se
bs3er1l
bs3erz
b1so
b8sof
b1s2p2
b2st1h
bstr6
b3stru
b5stä
b1su
b6sun
2b1t
b2t1h
1bu
b6ui
bu1ie
bu6l6k
b8u1re
bu1si
bu6sin
6b1v
2b1w
1by1
by1t
by6te.
8b1z
1bä
b5ä6s5
1bü
bü1b6e2
b3ü4ber1
b6ü5be1re
bü1ge6
büge1l5e
bü2r1s
bür6sc
1ca
cag6
ca5la
c2a6re
ca5y
c1c
1ce
ce1li
celi4c
celic8h5
ce1ro
c8h
2ch.
1c8hae
ch1ah
ch3a2k1t
cha1me
cha6mer
8c6hanz
5cha1ra
3ch2a1ri
5cha1to
6ch1b2
1che1f
6chei
ch3e2il
ch3eis
che6rk
6cher1kl8
6ch1f2
4ch1h
5chia1d
5chias
6chi6ns
8ch1j
chl6
5ch4lor
6ch2m
2chn6
ch1ni
ch8n6ie
5cho.
8chob
c2hoi
choi8d
6ch1p
c6hr
ch3ren
ch6res
ch3rü
2chs
2cht
cht5h6a
cht3hi
5chth2on
ch1ti
ch6tin
6chuh
chu4la
6ch3unt
chu2t6t
8chw
1ci
ci5tr6
c2k
2ck.
ck1ei
4c2k1h
ck3l8
ck3n8
c1k2o
ck5o8f
c1k1r8
2c2ks
ckst8
ckstr6
ck5stra
ck6s5u
c2l
1c8o
con6ne
8cor1b
cos6t
c3q
1c6r
8c1t
1cu
1cy
5cä1
cö5
1da.
8daas
2d1a2b1g2
8da1br
6da2b1t
6d1a2b1w
1dac
da2gr4
6d5a6l1k
8d5a2m1t
dan1c
dan1ce
dan6ce.
da1ni
dan6ie
dani5er
dan1ke
dan8ker
2d1an5l6
danla6
6da6ns
8dan1zi
6dan1zu
d1ap
da2r1a8
2d1ar1b
d3ar1c
da6r1m
dar1me
dar6men
4d3a2r1t
8darz
1dat
8da2t1m8
2d1auf
2d1aus
2d1b
2d1c
2d1d
d5de
d3d2h
d1dä
ddä2m1m
ddäm1me8
1de
2deal
de5an
dec8h
de3cha
de1e
de1f
de1fe6
6de2ff
2d1e6hr
5d4eic
de5isc
de1la
de8lar
de2ls
del6s5e
del1sp2
del6spr6
de1ma
de4mag
de1mu
de8mun
de1ne
de8nep
dene6r
den1ge
8denge.
8deng8en
de5o6d
2deol
de5ram
de8rd
8der2d1b
de1re
d2erei
der5ein
de1ro
de2r1r
d8e2r1s
d2e1ru
der5um
de1sa
de4s3am
de4s3an
de4sau
de1si
de6s2il
de4sin
de1so
de8sor
de1sp2
de4spr6
de2su
8deul
de5us.
2d1f
df2l
2d1g
2d1h
1di
dia5c
di5a1ra
di1ce5
dic8h
di3c6hr
di5ena
di1gn8
d2il
di1la
di2l8s
di1na
8di2n1d
6din1f
4d3in1h
2d1i6ns
d2io
di5o6d
d2ip
di3p4t
di1se
di8sen
dis1p2
dis1pe
di5s8p8er
di6s5to
dis3tr6
di1ta
di8tan
di1ti
di8tin
d1j
6dje
2dju
2d1k
2d1l
2d1m
2d1n6
d1ni6
dn1j
dnje6
1do
6d5o1be
do6ber1f
6d5ony
do3ran
6do8rd
2d1o8r1g
do2r1t
dor4t3h
6do1th
do2t1t
dott8e
2d1p
d5q
dr4
1drah
8drak
d5r6a2n1d
6d1re.
4drec8h
d6rec2k
4d3reg
8d3reic
dre2if
d5rei1fe
8drem
8d1ren
2d1rer
8dres.
6d5r1h8
1dria
d1ric
8dri2n1d
droi6
dro5x
1dru
8drut
drö2s5c
1drü
drü5b
drü8sc
2ds
d1sa
d6san
d1sat6
d1sc
dsc8h
5d6scha.
d1schi
5dschi1k
d1se
dse8e
d8se8r1g
8ds1l
d1sp2
d4s1pak
ds2p2o
d8spä
d1st
d1sü
2dt
d1ta
d1te
d1ti
d1to
d2t1s6
d1tu
d5tä
1du
du5a2ls
du1b6
du1e
du2ft
duf4t3r6
4d3uh
d6ui
du5ie
8du2m1l
8du2m1w
2d1u2n1d
du8ni
6d5unt
dur2c
durc8h3
6dur1l
du2r1s
6dursa
8du2r1t
dus1t
dusc8h
du8sc6hr
2d1v
2d1w
dwa8l
2d1z
1dä
6däh
8dä2n1d
dä6r
dö1b
dö8bl8
d5öl
dör1f
dör6fl
dö8sc
d5ö4st
1dü
ea1be
ea4ben
e1ac
e1ah
e1a2k1t
e1al.
e5al1f
e1a2l1g
ea1li
e5a8lin
e1a6l1k
e1a6ll
e5a6l1p
e1a2l1t
e5a2l1w
e1am
e1a2n1d
ea1ni
ea6nim
e1ar.
e5ar1f
e1a6rk
e5a6r1m
e3a2r1t
e5at.
e6a1te
e6a5t6l
e8a2ts
e5a2t1t
e6au.
e1aus
e1b
e1ba
e6b5am
e1be
ebe6ns
eben4s5e6
ebl8
eb1li
eb4lie
e8bs
eb1se
eb4ser
eb1si
eb4s3in
ec8h
e1che
e8cherz
e1chi
e6ch3m
8e2ch3n6
ec6h1r
e2chs
ech1se
ech8se2n1d
ech4su
e1chu
ec2k
ec1ka
eck5an
e5c2l
e1d
ee5a
ee3e
ee5g
e1ei
ee5isc
eei4s3t
ee1le
ee6le2n1d
e1e6ll
ee5lö
e1e8rd
ee3r4e
ee8reng
eere6s5
ee5rä
ee1ta
ee6tat
e1ex
e1f
e6fau
e1fe
e8fe8b
e2ff
ef5fe
3effek
efr6
ef3rom
e1ge
ege6ra
eg1los
eglo6si
1egy
e1ha
e6h5ac8h
eh5a6ns
e6hap
eh5auf
e1he
e1hi
ehl3a
eh1le
eh3l5ein
eh1mu
eh1ne
eh2n5ec
e1ho
e6hr
ehr1a
eh1re
ehre6n
eh1ri
eh1ru
eh6r5um
e1hu
eh1w
e1hy
e1hä
e1hö
e3hüt
ei1a
eia6s
ei1ba
ei6bar
eic8h
eich3a
eic6h5r
ei1d
ei4dar
ei1de
ei6d5ei
ei8der1f
ei2ds
ei3d4sc
ei1e
e2if
ei1fe
8eifen
eifr6
3eifri
1eign8
e2il
ei6l1d
ei1ma
ei6mab
ei8mag
ein1a4
ei8nat
ei1ne
ei8ner1h8
ei8ness
ei6ne1te
ein1g
e8i1ni
ein1k
ei1no
ei6n5o1d
ei8no1k
ei4nor
ei6ns
e3in1sä
e2i1o
e1i2rr
ei5ru
ei1sa
ei8sab
eisc8h
ei5s2chn6
ei1se
ei6s5ent
ei1so
ei8sol
ei1ta
ei4t3al
eit3ar
eit1h
ei6thi
ei8tho
ei2ts
eit1sam
eit8sa2m1t
ei1tu
ei6t5um
e1j
1e4k1d
e1ke
e1ki
e1k2l8
e1kn8
ek2ni4
e1la
e2l1al
6elan
e6lan1f
e8l1an5l6
e6l5a6ns
el3ar1b
el3a6r1m
e6l3a2r1t
5e6las1ti
e6lau1ge
e2lb
el8bs
elb1st5a
e1le
6ele1f
ele6h
e6l5e1he
e8le2if
e6l5ein1h
1elek
e8lel
3ele1me
e6lemen
e6len1te
e6l5e1pi
e1ler
e4l3e2rr
ele2r1s
e6l5ersc
el1f
elf2l
e2l1g2
e1li
e6l5i6ns
e6ll
el1le
el1l8er
4e1lo
e4l3o1fe
e2ls
el1so
el8soh
e2l1t
el5ten
el8tent
5elte2rn
e1lu
elut2
e1lä
e1lü
e2m1d
em1de
em8dei
e2m1m
em1me
em8meis
4e1mo
emo5s
e2mp
1emp1f
1emp1t
e2m1t
1emto
e1mu
emu6rk4
emur2ks5
e1mä
ena1be
en5a6ben
ena2c
enac8h
en5a2chs
en5ac2k
e1na1d
en5af
en5a6ll
en3a2l1t
en1am
en3an.
en3ant
en3anz
en1a6p
en1ar
en1a6s
6e1nat
e4n3auf
en3aus
en1c
en2ce
e2n1d
enda6l
en1de
end5er1f
end5e8r1g
en8dess
e1ne
4ene.
e2nec
en5ec2k
ene1f
e8ne2ff
e6n5e6hr
e6n5eim
e8n3eis
6enem.
6enen
e4nent
4ener.
e8ne8rd
e6n3er1f
e4ne8r1g
5ener1gi
ener1l
e6n5erla
en5e2r1s
e6nerst
en5er1w
6enes
e6n5ess
e2nex
en3glo
2e1ni
en1ni
enn6i6s5
en1no
enn6os4
en6ns8
e1no
eno1be
e6nober
eno8f
e6n5opf
e4n3o8rd
e6ns
en1se
en8se2r1s
ens1k2
ens8kl8
en1sp2
ens1p2o
ens6por
en1ta
en5t6ag
en4t3a5go
en1te
enter1b
en8ter1bu
en1ti
en6ti1d
en2t1l
3entl8a
en1tr6
ent5ric
en2t1w
5entwic
5entwu
1en2t1z
e1nu
en6u5i
e3ny
en1za
en8zan
en1öf
e1nös
e1nüg
eo1c
e5o6fe
eo1k
e5o2k1k2
e1on.
e3on1f
e5on1k
e5on5l6
e5on1r
e5opf
e5ops
e5or.
e1o8rd
e1o8r1g
eo5r6h8
eo1t
e1pa
e1pe
e8pee
e6p5e6g
ep5ent
e1p2f
e1pi
5epi1d
epi1de
e6pidem
e1pl8
e1p2o
5epos
e6pos.
ep4p3a
e1pr6
e1pä
e1q
e1ra.
er5aal
8er6a1ba
era1be
e5r6ab8el
er5a6ben
e5ra1bi
er3a8b1s
er3ac8h
era5e
era5k6l8
e2r3a6ll
er3a2m1t
e3r6a2n1d
e3ra1ne
er3a6ns
e5r8anz.
e1rap
er3ar1c
e3r2a1ri
er3a6si
e1rat
era2t3s
er3auf
e3r6aum
er1b
er8bs
3erb1se
er1c
e1re
4e5re.
er3ec2k
er5e2g1g
